Massachusetts, session 194th, H3596.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 58 of Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2020 official
edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word "terms" in line 30, the following: "or three
consecutive terms for local and regional cultural councils representing a population of 15,000 or
less."
of 1